test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kuree_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kuŗē: # Noun 18 'eng /est kurat/fin' - full paradigm
     kuŗē+N+Sg+Nom: kuŗē
     kuŗē+N+Sg+Gen: kuŗē
     kuŗē+N+Sg+Par: [kuʼŗŗõ, kuŗŗõ]
     kuŗē+N+Sg+Dat: kuŗēn
     kuŗē+N+Sg+Ins: kuŗēks
     kuŗē+N+Sg+Ill: [kuʼŗŗõ, kuŗŗõ]
     kuŗē+N+Sg+Ela: kuŗēst
     kuŗē+N+Pl+Nom: kuŗēd
     kuŗē+N+Pl+Gen: kuŗēd
     kuŗē+N+Pl+Par: [kuʼŗḑi, kuŗḑi]
     kuŗē+N+Pl+Dat: kuŗēdõn
     kuŗē+N+Pl+Ins: kuŗēdõks
     kuŗē+N+Pl+Ill: [kuʼŗži, kuŗži]
     kuŗē+N+Pl+Ela: [kuʼŗsti, kuŗsti]
